Louisiana, session 2026, HB195.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 17:3399.20 is hereby enacted to read as follows:
§3399.20. Self-defense chemical spray; possession on campus; exceptions
A. Except as provided in Subsection B of this Section, no public
postsecondary education institution shall prohibit students from possessing
self-defense chemical spray on campus. For purposes of this Section, "self-defense
chemical spray" means a device carried solely for purposes of lawful self-defense
that is compact in size, designed to be carried on or about the person, and contains
not more than two ounces of chemical.
Page 1 of 2
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 195 ENROLLED
B. A public postsecondary education institution may prohibit students from
possessing self-defense chemical spray at any preschool, elementary school, or
secondary school operated by the institution; at any patient care facility located on
institutional property; and on campus in any building or at any event where armed
security is provided or where such possession is prohibited by contract.
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 2 of 2
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.